North Carolina, session 2025, SB327.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Title. – This act shall be known as the North Carolina Bitcoin Reserve
and Investment Act.
SECTION 2. Purpose. – The purpose of this act is to establish a strategic Bitcoin
reserve for the State of North Carolina, promote Bitcoin investment as a financial innovation
strategy, and position North Carolina as a leader in state-level cryptocurrency adoption.
SECTION 3. Reserve Established. – The Office of the State Treasurer is authorized
to allocate up to ten percent (10%) of public funds into Bitcoin (BTC) as part of the State's
long-term financial strategy. Bitcoin acquired with funds allocated pursuant to this section shall
be placed into a reserve (Bitcoin Reserve). The Treasurer is authorized to engage in
Bitcoin-backed investment strategies, including staking, lending, and other regulated
yield-generating activities.
SECTION 4. Management. – The Treasurer shall manage the Bitcoin Reserve as a
strategic asset in conformity with the following requirements:
(1) The Treasurer shall ensure Bitcoin in the Bitcoin Reserve is held in cold
storage wallets with multi-signature authentication to prevent unauthorized
access.
(2) The Treasurer shall establish a department within the Office of the State
Treasurer to have custody of the Bitcoin Reserve in order to (i) ensure
management is by a State entity and (ii) have direct State control over assets
located in the Bitcoin Reserve.
(3) The Treasurer shall establish a Bitcoin Economic Advisory Board composed
of industry experts to provide ongoing guidance.
(4) The Treasurer shall conduct monthly audits to verify the reserve status,
balance, security, and financial performance and shall implement
State-backed insurance policies to protect the reserve against cyber threats and
economic downturns.
SECTION 5. Acquisition. – The acquisition of Bitcoin shall be conducted through
strategic bulk purchases to take advantage of favorable market conditions. Bitcoin purchases
shall be executed through regulated U.S.-based cryptocurrency exchanges to ensure compliance
with federal and State regulations. The Treasurer shall explore Bitcoin mining operations as a
means of increasing the State's holdings at minimal cost.
*S327-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 6. Asset Use Restrictions. – The Bitcoin Reserve shall be held as a
long-term asset. Use of the Bitcoin Reserve is limited to and by the following:
(1) The use is (i) required to respond to a severe financial crisis where alternative
reserve assets are insufficient, (ii) part of a State-approved investment strategy
to enhance the value of the Bitcoin Reserve, (iii) to finance critical
infrastructure and economic development projects approved by the General
Assembly, and (iv) to provide funding for Bitcoin-related research, education,
and business incentives to foster economic growth.
(2) Liquidation of Bitcoin in the Bitcoin Reserve is approved by at least
two-thirds of the members of both chambers of the General Assembly present
and voting.
(3) The use is to back bonds as an alternative financing mechanism for public
projects.
SECTION 7. Regulation Compliance. – The Treasurer shall comply with all
applicable federal and State laws regarding cryptocurrency holdings and taxation. The State shall
advocate for Bitcoin-friendly regulations at the federal level to protect State Bitcoin reserves.
SECTION 8. Reporting. – The Treasurer shall submit a quarterly report to the
General Assembly detailing the status, value, and performance of the Bitcoin Reserve. In
addition, to promote transparency and accountability, the Treasurer shall make the report
available on the Treasurer's website.
SECTION 9. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 327-First Edition